basic-cs.aff
FLAG long
SFX A1 Y 767
SFX A1   íst         tu         číst
SFX A1   íst         teš        číst
SFX A1   íst         te         číst
SFX A1   íst         teme       číst
SFX A1   íst         tete       číst
SFX A1   íst         tou        číst
SFX A1   íst         ti         číst
SFX A1   íst         těme       číst
SFX A1   íst         těte       číst
SFX A1   íst         etl        číst
SFX A1   íst         etla       číst
SFX A1   íst         etlo       číst
SFX A1   íst         etli       číst
SFX A1   íst         etly       číst
SFX A1   íst         ta         číst
SFX A1   íst         touc       číst
SFX A1   íst         touce      číst
SFX A1   íst         ětu        [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ěteš       [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ěte        [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ěteme      [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ětete      [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ětou       [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ěť         [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ěťme       [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ěťte       [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ětl        [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ětla       [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ětlo       [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ětli       [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ětly       [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ěta        [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ětouc      [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ětouce     [dnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         edu        [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         edeš       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         ede        [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         edeme      [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         edete      [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         edou       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         eď         [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         eďme       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         eďte       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         edl        [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         edla       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         edlo       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         edli       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         edly       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         eda        [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         edouc      [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   íst         edouce     [^čdnt]íst
SFX A1   ést         esu        nést
SFX A1   ést         eseš       nést
SFX A1   ést         ese        nést
SFX A1   ést         eseme      nést
SFX A1   ést         esete      nést
SFX A1   ést         esou       nést
SFX A1   ést         es         nést
SFX A1   ést         esme       nést
SFX A1   ést         este       nést
SFX A1   ést         esl        nést
SFX A1   ést         esla       nést
SFX A1   ést         eslo       nést
SFX A1   ést         esli       nést
SFX A1   ést         esly       nést
SFX A1   ést         esa        nést
SFX A1   ést         esouc      nést
SFX A1   ést         esouce     nést
SFX A1   ést         etu        [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         eteš       [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         ete        [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         eteme      [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         etete      [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         etou       [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         eť         [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         eťme       [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         eťte       [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         etl        [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         etla       [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         etlo       [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         etli       [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         etly       [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         eta        [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         etouc      [^n]ést
SFX A1   ést         etouce     [^n]ést
SFX A1   ást         adu        ást
SFX A1   ást         adeš       ást
SFX A1   ást         ade        ást
SFX A1   ást         ademe      ást
SFX A1   ást         adete      ást
SFX A1   ást         adou       ást
SFX A1   ást         aď         ást
SFX A1   ást         aďme       ást
SFX A1   ást         aďte       ást
SFX A1   ást         adl        ást
SFX A1   ást         adla       ást
SFX A1   ást         adlo       ást
SFX A1   ást         adli       ást
SFX A1   ást         adly       ást
SFX A1   ást         ada        ást
SFX A1   ást         adouc      ást
SFX A1   ást         adouce     ást
SFX A1   ézt         ezu        ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ezeš       ézt
SFX A1   ézt         eze        ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ezeme      ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ezete      ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ezou       ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ez         ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ezme       ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ezte       ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ezl        ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ezla       ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ezlo       ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ezli       ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ezly       ézt
SFX A1   ézt         eza        ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ezouc      ézt
SFX A1   ézt         ezouce     ézt
SFX A1   rát         eru        rát
SFX A1   rát         ereš       rát
SFX A1   rát         ere        rát
SFX A1   rát         ereme      rát
SFX A1   rát         erete      rát
SFX A1   rát         erou       rát
SFX A1   rát         er         rát
SFX A1   rát         erme       rát
SFX A1   rát         erte       rát
SFX A1   rát         era        rát
SFX A1   rát         erouc      rát
SFX A1   rát         erouce     rát
SFX A1   lát         elu        lát
SFX A1   lát         eleš       lát
SFX A1   lát         ele        lát
SFX A1   lát         eleme      lát
SFX A1   lát         elete      lát
SFX A1   lát         elou       lát
SFX A1   lát         el         lát
SFX A1   lát         elme       lát
SFX A1   lát         elte       lát
SFX A1   lát         ela        lát
SFX A1   lát         elouc      lát
SFX A1   lát         elouce     lát
SFX A1   át          u          [^lr]át
SFX A1   át          eš         [^lr]át
SFX A1   át          e          [^lr]át
SFX A1   át          eme        [^lr]át
SFX A1   át          ete        [^lr]át
SFX A1   át          ou         [^lr]át
SFX A1   át          i          [^lr]át
SFX A1   át          ěme        [^lr]át
SFX A1   át          ěte        [^lr]át
SFX A1   át          al         át
SFX A1   át          ala        át
SFX A1   át          alo        át
SFX A1   át          ali        át
SFX A1   át          aly        át
SFX A1   t           i          ct
SFX A1   i           t          ci
SFX A1   éct         eču        éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         eku        éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ečeš       éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         eče        éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ečeme      éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ečete      éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ečou       éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ekou       éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         eč         éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ec         éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ečme       éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ecme       éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ečte       éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ecte       éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ekl        [^l]éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ekla       [^l]éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         eklo       [^l]éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ekli       [^l]éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ekly       [^l]éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         eka        [^l]éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ekouc      [^l]éc[it]
SFX A1   éct         ekouce     [^l]éc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        uču        ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        uku        ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        učeš       ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        uče        ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        učeme      ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        učete      ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        učou       ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        ukou       ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        uč         ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        uc         ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        učme       ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        ucme       ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        učte       ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        ucte       ouc[it]
SFX A1   ct          kl         ouc[it]
SFX A1   ct          kla        ouc[it]
SFX A1   ct          klo        ouc[it]
SFX A1   ct          kli        ouc[it]
SFX A1   ct          kly        ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        uka        ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        ukouc      ouc[it]
SFX A1   ouct        ukouce     ouc[it]
SFX A1   ci          hu         oc[it]
SFX A1   oci         ůžu        oc[it]
SFX A1   oci         ůžeš       oc[it]
SFX A1   oci         ůže        oc[it]
