basic-cs.dic
aktualizovat/A1T1N1
asimilovat/A1T1N1
blahořečit/A1T1N1
bolet/A1N1
bránit/A1T1N1
celebrovat/A1T1N1
chránit/A1T1N1
cvičit/A1T1N1
deklasovat/A1T1N1
dezinfikovat/A1T1N1
divit/A1N1
dohodnout/A1T1N1
dolovat/A1T1N1
doplácet/A1J1T1N1
doručovat/A1T1N1
dosvědčovat/A1N1
dovršovat/A1T1N1
drnčet/A1N1
dýchnout/A1N1
evokovat/A1T1N1
filmovat/A1T1N1
fúzovat/A1N1
havarovat/A1T1N1
hodit/A1C1N1
houstnout/A1N1
hubnout/A1N1
implementovat/A1T1N1
integrovat/A1T1N1
jistit/A1C1N1
klapat/A1J1T1N1
klábosit/A1N1
komponovat/A1T1N1
kontaktovat/A1T1N1
korigovat/A1T1N1
kralovat/A1N1
krčit/A1T1N1
kápnout/A1T1N1
lahodit/A1N1
libovat/A1N1
loupat/A1J1T1N1
manifestovat/A1T1N1
minout/A1T1N1
motivovat/A1T1N1
mávnout/A1T1N1
nabídnout/A1T1N1
nadřazovat/A1T1N1
naklonit/A1T1N1
nalistovat/A1T1N1
naordinovat/A1T1N1
napršet/A1T1N1
nasazovat/A1T1N1
nastolit/A1T1N1
natankovat/A1T1N1
navozovat/A1T1N1
nazvat/A1T1N1
negovat/A1T1N1
násobit/A1T1N1
obhájit/A1T1N1
obnažit/A1T1N1
obsahovat/A1T1N1
obětovat/A1T1N1
ochutit/A1C1N1
odcizit/A1T1N1
odhadovat/A1T1N1
odkupovat/A1T1N1
odměňovat/A1T1N1
odpuzovat/A1T1N1
odstavit/A1T1N1
odtajnit/A1T1N1
odvázat/A1T1N1
ohlédnout/A1N1
okomentovat/A1T1N1
omezovat/A1T1N1
operovat/A1T1N1
opožďovat/A1T1N1
ordinovat/A1T1N1
oslepnout/A1N1
osušit/A1T1N1
otisknout/A1C1T1N1
ověřit/A1T1N1
očišťovat/A1T1N1
parafovat/A1T1N1
pečetit/A1T1N1
plnit/A1T1N1
pochodit/A1N1
podepřít/A1T1N1
podpisovat/A1T1N1
podtrhovat/A1T1N1
pohlédnout/A1N1
pojišťovat/A1T1N1
pokuřovat/A1T1N1
politizovat/A1T1N1
pomyslit/A1C1N1
poplést/A1T1N1
porozhlédnout/A1N1
poskytnout/A1T1N1
postrkovat/A1T1N1
potrápit/A1T1N1
považovat/A1T1N1
pověřovat/A1T1N1
počíst/A1T1N1
pramenit/A1N1
probudit/A1C1N1
profitovat/A1N1
prokazovat/A1T1N1
promlčet/A1T1N1
propojit/A1T1N1
proskočit/A1T1N1
protlačit/A1T1N1
prořídnout/A1N1
pustit/A1C1N1
přecenit/A1T1N1
předstihovat/A1T1N1
přehradit/A1C1N1
přeletět/A1T1N1
přepisovat/A1T1N1
přesazovat/A1T1N1
přesvědčit/A1T1N1
přetěžovat/A1T1N1
přezimovat/A1N1
přidržet/A1T1N1
přikývnout/A1N1
připevnit/A1T1N1
přirazit/A1C1X1N1
přitahovat/A1T1N1
přivézt/A1T1N1
přiťuknout/A1T1N1
razit/A1C1X1N1
reinvestovat/A1T1N1
respektovat/A1T1N1
ronit/A1T1N1
rozepisovat/A1T1N1
rozhořčit/A1T1N1
rozlehnout/A1N1
rozmnožovat/A1T1N1
rozprchnout/A1T1N1
roztančit/A1T1N1
rozvrátit/A1C1N1
rozřešit/A1T1N1
sabotovat/A1T1N1
sdělovat/A1T1N1
sestavovat/A1T1N1
sfouknout/A1T1N1
situovat/A1T1N1
skončit/A1T1N1
slitovat/A1T1N1
smeknout/A1T1N1
snižovat/A1T1N1
soutěžit/A1T1N1
splácet/A1J1T1N1
sportovat/A1N1
sršet/A1N1
stlačovat/A1T1N1
strnout/A1N1
stáčet/A1J1T1N1
sužovat/A1T1N1
svěsit/A1C1N1
taktizovat/A1N1
tišit/A1T1N1
trefit/A1T1N1
trýznit/A1T1N1
tápat/A1J1N1
ubližovat/A1N1
ucítit/A1T1N1
uhranout/A1T1N1
ukončovat/A1T1N1
ulevovat/A1N1
umožnit/A1T1N1
uplatit/A1C1N1
upřednostňovat/A1T1N1
usednout/A1N1
usnést/A1T1N1
usuzovat/A1T1N1
utrousit/A1C1N1
uvelebit/A1T1N1
uzavřít/A1T1N1
uštvat/A1T1N1
velebit/A1T1N1
vklouznout/A1N1
vniknout/A1N1
vraždit/A1T1N1
vsítit/A1T1N1
vybouchnout/A1T1N1
vychýlit/A1T1X1N1
vyfotit/A1C1N1
vyhotovit/A1T1N1
vyhýbat/A1J1N1
vykoledovat/A1T1N1
vykročit/A1T1N1
vylepšovat/A1T1N1
vylézt/A1T1N1
vymyslet/A1N1
vynasnažit/A1N1
vyplavat/A1N1
vypravovat/A1T1N1
vypálit/A1T1N1
vyschnout/A1N1
vystavovat/A1T1N1
vystřelit/A1T1N1
vytipovat/A1T1N1
vytypovat/A1T1N1
vyvinout/A1T1N1
vyvěšovat/A1T1N1
vyčistit/A1C1N1
vyšetřit/A1T1N1
vzchopit/A1T1N1
vzplanout/A1N1
vítězit/A1T1N1
všimnout/A1T1N1
zabouchnout/A1T1N1
zacelit/A1T1N1
zaevidovat/A1T1N1
zahrnout/A1T1N1
zakašlat/A1N1
zakreslit/A1T1N1
založit/A1T1N1
zamořit/A1T1N1
zanevřít/A1N1
zaplavovat/A1T1N1
zapudit/A1C1N1
zarámovat/A1T1N1
zastavit/A1T1N1
zastřít/A1T1N1
zatemňovat/A1T1N1
zatáčet/A1J1T1N1
zavrhnout/A1C1N1
zazářit/A1N1
zaštítit/A1T1N1
zbudovat/A1T1N1
zdomácnět/A1T1N1
zdůvodňovat/A1T1N1
zformulovat/A1T1N1
zhrozit/A1T1N1
zkazit/A1C1N1
zkopat/A1J1T1N1
zkřížit/A1T1N1
zmenšovat/A1T1N1
zmírňovat/A1T1N1
znepokojit/A1T1N1
zničit/A1T1N1
zohlednit/A1T1N1
zpevňovat/A1T1N1
způsobit/A1T1N1
ztrácet/A1J1T1N1
zvyšovat/A1T1N1
zřizovat/A1T1N1
řinout/A1T1N1
štípnout/A1T1N1
